Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 2. Judicial Proceedings.

§ 91-8-201.
Role of court in administration of trust.

The court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust’s administration, including, but not limited to, a proceeding to:

Request instructions;

Determine the existence or nonexistence of any immunity, power, privilege, duty or right;

Approve a nonjudicial settlement;

Interpret or construe the terms of the trust;

Determine the validity of a trust or of any of its terms;

Approve a trustee’s report or accounting or compel a trustee to report or account;

Direct a trustee to refrain from performing a particular act or grant to a trustee any necessary or desirable power;

Review the actions or approve the proposed actions of a trustee, including the exercise of a discretionary power;

Accept the resignation of a trustee;

Appoint or remove a trustee;

Determine a trustee’s compensation;

Transfer a trust’s principal place of administration or a trust’s property to another jurisdiction;

Determine the liability of a trustee for an action relating to the trust and compel redress of a breach of trust by any available remedy;

Modify or terminate a trust;

Combine trusts or divide a trust;

Determine liability of a trust for debts of a beneficiary and living settlor;

Determine liability of a trust for debts, expenses of administration, and statutory allowances chargeable against the estate of a deceased settlor;

Determine the liability of a trust for claims, expenses and taxes in connection with the settlement of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death; and

Ascertain beneficiaries and determine to whom property will pass upon final or partial termination of a trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-202.
Jurisdiction over trustee and beneficiary.

By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of administration to this state, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trustee, beneficiary, or other person receiving property from the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-203.
Subject-matter jurisdiction.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), the chancery court has exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings in this state brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust.

Any other court granted statutory equitable jurisdiction has concurrent jurisdiction with the chancery court in any proceedings in this state brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust.

The chancery court has concurrent jurisdiction with other courts of this state in other proceedings involving a trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-204.
Venue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), venue for a judicial proceeding involving a trust is in the county of this state in which the trust’s principal place of administration is or will be located and, if the trust is created by will and the estate is not yet closed, in the county in which the decedent’s estate is being administered.

If a trust has no trustee, venue for a judicial proceeding for the appointment of a trustee is in a county of this state in which a beneficiary resides, in a county in which any trust property is located, and if the trust is created by will, in the county in which the decedent’s estate was or is being administered.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-205.
Judicial accountings and settlements.

A trustee may file an accounting of the trustee’s administration of a trust in court at any time and seek a partial or final settlement thereof or, upon petition of an interested party, a court may order a trustee to render an accounting of the trustee’s administration of a trust and require a partial or final settlement thereof. Notice of such judicial proceeding shall be provided to the trustee and each beneficiary, or representative thereof pursuant to Article 3, as provided by the applicable rules of civil procedure.

A trust accounting must be a reasonably understandable report from the date of the last accounting or, if none, from the date upon which the trustee became accountable, or other such date the court may set, which provides reasonable detail of the transactions affecting the administration of the trust, and which adequately discloses the following information:

The accounting must identify the trust, the trustee furnishing the accounting, and the time period covered by the accounting.

The accounting must show all receipts and disbursements occurring during the accounting period. Gains and losses realized during the accounting period must also be shown.

The accounting, to the extent feasible, must identify and value trust assets on hand at the close of the accounting period. For each asset or class of assets reasonably capable of valuation, the accounting shall contain two (2) values, (A) the asset acquisition value or carrying value, and (B) the estimated current value, if feasible. The accounting must identify each known noncontingent liability with an estimated current amount of the liability if known.

To the extent feasible, the accounting must show the significant noncash transactions affecting the assets of the trust, including name changes in investment holdings, adjustments to carrying value, or stock splits.

The accounting must reflect the allocation of receipts and disbursements between income and principal when the allocation affects the interest of any beneficiary of the trust.

Any order or judgment of the court on such accounting and partial or final settlement shall be final and conclusive as to all matters occurring during the accounting period, and appeals therefrom shall and must be taken in the manner provided for from any other final judgment of the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2014.